Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1522XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 529 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.59 Nursing facility ââ cost 1 reports. 2 A nursing facility shall include in the facilityâs annual 3 cost report submitted to the department an affidavit signed by 4 the owner or chief executive officer of the nursing facility 5 that states all costs are accurately reported in the cost 6 report and that, to the ownerâs or chief executive officerâs 7 knowledge, all Medicaid claims have been submitted in good 8 faith. 9